Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
TENANT OBLIGATIONS

§521-51 Tenant to maintain dwelling unit.
Each tenant shall at all times during the tenancy:

(1) Comply with all applicable building and housing
laws materially affecting health and safety;

(2) Keep that part of the premises which the tenant
occupies and uses as clean and safe as the conditions of the premises permit;

(3) Dispose from the tenant's dwelling unit all
rubbish, garbage, and other organic or flammable waste in a clean and safe
manner;

(4) Keep all plumbing fixtures in the dwelling unit
or used by the tenant as clean as their condition permits;

(5) Properly use and operate all electrical and
plumbing fixtures and appliances in the dwelling unit or used by the tenant;

(6) Not permit any person on the premises with the
tenant's permission to wilfully destroy, deface, damage, impair, or remove any
part of the premises which include the dwelling unit or the facilities,
equipment, or appurtenances thereto, nor oneself do any such thing;

(7) Keep the dwelling unit and all facilities,
appliances, furniture, and furnishings supplied therein by the landlord in fit
condition, reasonable wear and tear excepted; and

(8) Comply with all obligations, restrictions, rules,
and the like which are in accordance with section 521-52 and which the landlord
can demonstrate are reasonably necessary for the preservation of the property
and protection of the persons of the landlord, other tenants, or any other
person. [L 1972, c 132, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 143, §2]

Case Notes

Where no evidence that tenant's failure to replace damaged
tiles constituted a violation of applicable building and housing laws
materially affecting health and safety under paragraph (1), landlord was not
authorized under §521-69(a) to terminate tenant's lease. 87 H. 353 (App.), 956
P.2d 1285.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next